Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 14 OTHER OFFENSES
42-4-1412. Operation of bicycles, electric scooters, and other human-powered vehicles.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter has all of the rights and duties applicable to the driver of any other vehicle under this article 4, except as to special regulations in this article 4, except as provided in section 42-4-1412.5, and except as to those provisions that by their nature can have no application. Bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter riders shall comply with the rules set forth in this section and section 42-4-221, and, when using streets and highways within incorporated cities and towns, are subject to local ordinances regulating the operation of bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, and electric scooters as provided in section 42-4-111. Notwithstanding any contrary provision in this article 4, when a county or municipality has adopted an ordinance or resolution pursuant to section 42-4-1412.5, riders are subject to the local ordinance or resolution.

It is the intent of the general assembly that nothing contained in House Bill No. 1246, enacted at the second regular session of the fifty-sixth general assembly, shall in any way be construed to modify or increase the duty of the department of transportation or any political subdivision to sign or maintain highways or sidewalks or to affect or increase the liability of the state of Colorado or any political subdivision under the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall not be used to carry more persons at one time than the number for which it is designed or equipped.

A person riding upon a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall not attach the vehicle or the rider to any motor vehicle upon a roadway.

Any person operating a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter upon a roadway at less than the normal speed of traffic shall ride in the right-hand lane, subject to the following conditions:

If the right-hand lane then available for traffic is wide enough to be safely shared with overtaking vehicles, a bicyclist shall ride far enough to the right as judged safe by the bicyclist to facilitate the movement of such overtaking vehicles unless other conditions make it unsafe to do so.

A bicyclist may use a lane other than the right-hand lane when:

Preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private roadway or driveway;

Overtaking a slower vehicle; or

Taking reasonably necessary precautions to avoid hazards or road conditions.

Upon approaching an intersection where right turns are permitted and there is a dedicated right-turn lane, a bicyclist may ride on the left-hand portion of the dedicated right-turn lane even if the bicyclist does not intend to turn right.

A bicyclist shall not be expected or required to:

Ride over or through hazards at the edge of a roadway, including but not limited to fixed or moving objects, parked or moving vehicles, bicycles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or narrow lanes; or

Ride without a reasonable safety margin on the right-hand side of the roadway.

A person operating a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter upon a one-way roadway with two or more marked traffic lanes may ride as near to the left-hand curb or edge of the roadway as judged safe by the rider, subject to the following conditions:

If the left-hand lane then available for traffic is wide enough to be safely shared with overtaking vehicles, a bicyclist shall ride far enough to the left as judged safe by the bicyclist to facilitate the movement of such overtaking vehicles unless other conditions make it unsafe to do so.

A bicyclist shall not be expected or required to:

Ride over or through hazards at the edge of a roadway, including but not limited to fixed or moving objects, parked or moving vehicles, bicycles, pedestrians, animals, surface hazards, or narrow lanes; or

Ride without a reasonable safety margin on the left-hand side of the roadway.

Persons riding bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters upon a roadway shall not ride more than two abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles and electric scooters.

Persons riding bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters two abreast shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and, on a laned roadway, shall ride within a single lane.

A person operating a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall keep at least one hand on the handlebars at all times.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter intending to turn left shall follow a course described in sections 42-4-901 (1), 42-4-903, and 42-4-1007 or may make a left turn in the manner prescribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter intending to turn left shall approach the turn as closely as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway. After proceeding across the intersecting roadway to the far corner of the curb or intersection of the roadway edges, the rider shall stop, as much as practicable, out of the way of traffic. After stopping, the rider shall yield to any traffic proceeding in either direction along the roadway that the rider had been using. After yielding and complying with any official traffic control device or police officer regulating traffic on the highway along which the rider intends to proceed, the rider may proceed in the new direction.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (8), the transportation commission and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause official traffic control devices to be placed on roadways and thereby require and direct that a specific course be traveled.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (9), every person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall signal the intention to turn or stop in accordance with section 42-4-903; except that a person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter may signal a right turn with the right arm extended horizontally.

A signal of intention to turn right or left when required shall be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred feet traveled by the bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter before turning and shall be given while the bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter is stopped waiting to turn. A signal by hand and arm need not be given continuously if the hand is needed in the control or operation of the bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter upon and along a sidewalk or pathway or across a roadway upon and along a crosswalk shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian and shall give an audible signal before overtaking and passing the pedestrian. A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter in a crosswalk shall do so in a manner that is safe for pedestrians.

A person shall not ride a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter upon and along a sidewalk or pathway or across a roadway upon and along a crosswalk where the use of bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters is prohibited by official traffic control devices or local ordinances. A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall dismount before entering any crosswalk where required by official traffic control devices or local ordinances.

A person riding or walking a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter upon and along a sidewalk or pathway or across a roadway upon and along a crosswalk has all the rights and duties applicable to a pedestrian under the same circumstances, including the rights and duties granted and required by section

42-4-802

.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2005, p. 1353

, § 1, effective July 1, 2005.)

A person may park a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter on a sidewalk unless prohibited or restricted by an official traffic control device or local ordinance.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter parked on a sidewalk must not impede the normal and reasonable movement of pedestrian or other traffic.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter may be parked on the road at any angle to the curb or edge of the road at any location where parking is allowed.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter may be parked on the road abreast of one or more bicycles or electric scooters near the side of the road or any location where parking is allowed in such a manner as does not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic.

In all other respects, bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters parked anywhere on a highway must conform to the provisions of part 12 of this article 4 regulating the parking of vehicles.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense; except that section 42-2-127 shall not apply.

If any person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter violates any provision of this article 4 other than this section that is applicable to such a vehicle and for which a penalty is specified, the person is subject to the same specified penalty as any other vehicle; except that section 42-2-127 does not apply.

Upon request, the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall complete a report concerning an injury or death incident that involves a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter on the roadways of the state, even if the accident does not involve a motor vehicle.

A person may ride a class 1 or class 2 electrical assisted bicycle on a bike or pedestrian path where bicycles are authorized to travel.
(14) (a) (I) A person may ride a class 1 or class 2 electrical assisted bicycle on a bike or pedestrian path where bicycles are authorized to travel.

A local authority may prohibit the operation of a class 1 or class 2 electrical assisted bicycle on a bike or pedestrian path under its jurisdiction.

A person shall not ride a class 3 electrical assisted bicycle on a bike or pedestrian path unless:

The path is within a street or highway; or

The local authority permits the operation of a class 3 electrical assisted bicycle on a path under its jurisdiction.

A person under sixteen years of age shall not ride a class 3 electrical assisted bicycle upon any street, highway, or bike or pedestrian path; except that a person under sixteen years of age may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electrical assisted bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers.

A person shall not operate or ride as a passenger on a class 3 electrical assisted bicycle unless:

Each person under eighteen years of age is wearing a protective helmet of a type and design manufactured for use by operators of bicycles;

The protective helmet conforms to the design and specifications set forth by the United States consumer product safety commission or the American Society for Testing and Materials; and

The protective helmet is secured properly on the person's head with a chin strap while the class 3 electrical assisted bicycle is in motion.

A violation of subsection (15)(b) of this section does not constitute negligence or negligence per se in the context of any civil personal injury claim or lawsuit seeking damages.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2395, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(6)(a)(I), (9)(a), and (10) amended and (13) added, p. 1353, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5) and (6) R&RE, (SB 09-148), ch. 239, p. 1089, § 6, effective August 5; (1), (3), (4), IP(5), (5)(a), IP(6)(a), (6)(a)(II), (7), (8)(a), (8)(b), (9), (10)(a), (10)(b), (10)(c), (11), (12)(b), and (13) amended and (14) added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1281, §§ 62, 61, effective October 1; IP(5)(a), IP(5)(c), and (6) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1987, § 139, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

(14) amended and (15) added, (HB 17-1151), ch. 98, p. 297, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-144), ch. 193, p. 1280, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2019:

(1), (3), (4), IP(5)(a), IP(5)(c), (6), (7), (8)(a), (8)(b), (9), (10)(a), (10)(b), (10)(c), (11), (12)(b), and (13) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2562, § 14, effective May 23.

42-4-1412.5. Local adoption of alternative regulation of bicycles and electric scooters approaching intersections - alternative regulation described - validity of existing local ordinance or resolution - definitions.

A county or municipality may adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this section. If a county or municipality adopts an ordinance or resolution pursuant to this section, the ordinance or resolution must specify the following:

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter and approaching an intersection of a roadway with a stop sign shall slow down and, if required for safety, stop before entering the intersection. If a stop is not required for safety, the person shall slow to a reasonable speed and yield the right-of-way to any traffic or pedestrian in or approaching the intersection. After the person has slowed to a reasonable speed and yielded the right-of-way if required, the person may cautiously make a turn or proceed through the intersection without stopping.

For purposes of this subsection (1), a reasonable speed is fifteen miles per hour or less. A municipality, by ordinance, or a county, by resolution, may reduce the maximum reasonable speed at any individual intersection to ten miles per hour or raise the maximum reasonable speed to twenty miles per hour if the municipality or county also posts signs at the intersection stating that lower or higher speed limitation.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter and approaching an intersection of a roadway with an illuminated red traffic control signal shall stop before entering the intersection and shall yield to all other traffic and pedestrians. Once the person has yielded, the person may cautiously proceed in the same direction through the intersection or make a right-hand turn. When a red traffic control signal is illuminated, a person shall not proceed through the intersection or turn right if an oncoming vehicle is turning or preparing to turn left in front of the person.

A person riding a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter approaching an intersection of a roadway with an illuminated red traffic control signal may make a left-hand turn only if turning onto a one-way street and only after stopping and yielding to other traffic and pedestrians. However, a person shall not turn left if a vehicle is traveling in the same direction as the person and the vehicle is turning or preparing to turn left. If the person is not turning left onto a one-way street, the person shall not make a left-hand turn at an intersection while a red traffic control signal is illuminated.

If a county or municipality adopted a valid ordinance or resolution that regulates bicycles or electrical assisted bicycles substantially as described in subsection (1) of this section prior to May 3, 2018, that ordinance or resolution remains valid.

(2.5) Nothing in this section affects the validity of an ordinance or resolution that a municipality, county, or city and county adopted pursuant to this section if the ordinance or resolution:

Was adopted before May 23, 2019; and

Applies to electric scooters.

The adoption of an ordinance or resolution in accordance with this section does not diminish or alter the authority of the department of transportation or the state transportation commission as those entities are defined in section 43-1-102 regarding the department's or commission's authority to regulate motor vehicle traffic on any portion of the state highway system as defined in section 43-2-101 (1).

As used in this section:

"Electrical assisted bicycle" means the term as it is defined in section 42-1-102 (28.5).

"Municipality" means a home rule or statutory city, town, or city and county.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-144), ch. 193, p. 1279, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2564, § 15, effective May 23.

42-4-1413. Eluding or attempting to elude a police officer.

Any operator of a motor vehicle who the officer has reasonable grounds to believe has violated a state law or municipal ordinance, who has received a visual or audible signal such as a red light or a siren from a police officer driving a marked vehicle showing the same to be an official police, sheriff, or Colorado state patrol car directing the operator to bring the operator's vehicle to a stop, and who willfully increases his or her speed or extinguishes his or her lights in an attempt to elude such police officer, or willfully attempts in any other manner to elude the police officer, or does elude such police officer commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2398, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1512 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For provision that the operation of vehicles and the movement of pedestrians pursuant to this section apply upon streets and highways and elsewhere throughout the state, see § 42-4-103 (2)(b).

42-4-1414. Use of dyed fuel on highways prohibited.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle upon any highway of the state using diesel fuel dyed to show that no taxes have been collected on the fuel.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Any person who commits a second violation of subsection (1) of this section within a twelve-month period shall be subject to an increased penalty pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N).

Any person who commits a third or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section within a twelve-month period shall be subject to an increased penalty pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(N).

Any person violating any provision of this section shall be subject to audit by the department regarding payment of motor fuel tax.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 665, § 2, effective May 18.

42-4-1415. Radar jamming devices prohibited - penalty.

No person shall use, possess, or sell a radar jamming device.

No person shall operate a motor vehicle with a radar jamming device in the motor vehicle.

For purposes of this section, "radar jamming device" means any active or passive device, instrument, mechanism, or equipment that is designed or intended to interfere with, disrupt, or scramble the radar or laser that is used by law enforcement agencies and peace officers to measure the speed of motor vehicles. "Radar jamming device" includes but is not limited to devices commonly referred to as "jammers" or "scramblers".

For purposes of this section, "radar jamming device" shall not include equipment that is legal under FCC regulations, such as a citizens' band radio, ham radio, or any other similar electronic equipment.

Radar jamming devices are subject to seizure by any peace officer and may be confiscated and destroyed by order of the court in which a violation of this section is charged.

A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, punishable as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II)(A).

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to peace officers acting in their official capacity.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 340, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-1416. Failure to present a valid transit pass or coupon - fare inspector authorization - definitions.

A person commits failure to present a valid transit pass or coupon if the person occupies, rides in, or uses a public transportation vehicle without paying the applicable fare or providing a valid transit pass or coupon.

A person shall not occupy, ride in, or use a public transportation vehicle without possession of proof of prior fare payment. A person shall present proof of prior fare payment upon demand of a fare inspector appointed or employed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, a peace officer, or any other employee or agent of a public transportation entity.

A violation of this section is a class B traffic infraction and is punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, fines for a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be retained by the clerk of the court in the city and county of Denver upon receipt by the clerk for a violation occurring within that jurisdiction, or transmitted to the state judicial department if the fine is receipted by the clerk of the court of any other county.

Public transportation entities may appoint or employ, with the power of removal, fare inspectors as necessary to enforce the provisions of this section. The employing public transportation entity shall determine the requirements for employment as a fare inspector.

A fare inspector appointed or employed pursuant to this section is authorized to enforce the provisions of this section while acting within the scope of his or her authority and in the performance of his or her duties. A fare inspector is authorized to issue a citation to a person who commits failure to provide a valid transit pass or coupon in violation of this section. The fare inspector shall issue a citation on behalf of the county in which the person occupying, riding in, or using a public transportation vehicle without paying the applicable fare is located at the time the violation is discovered. The public transportation entity whose fare inspector issued the citation shall timely deliver the citation to the clerk of the county court for the jurisdiction in which the accused person is located at the time the violation is discovered.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Proof of prior fare payment" means:

A transit pass valid for the day and time of use;

A receipt showing payment of the applicable fare for use of a public transportation vehicle during the day and time specified in the receipt; or

A prepaid ticket or series of tickets showing cancellation by a public transportation entity used within the day and time specified in the ticket.

"Public transportation entity" means a mass transit district, a mass transit authority, or any other public entity authorized under the laws of this state to provide mass transportation services to the general public.

"Public transportation vehicle" means a bus, a train, a light rail vehicle, or any other mode of transportation used by a public transportation entity to provide transportation services to the general public.

"Transit pass" means any pass, coupon, transfer, card, identification, token, ticket, or other document, whether issued by a public transportation entity or issued by an employer to employees pursuant to an agreement with a public transportation entity, used to obtain public transit.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-044), ch. 274, p. 1446, § 1, effective June 8.